src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
INTRODUCTION TO MORPHOLOGICAL ANALYSER OF Choctaw LANGUAGE.

# Definitions for Multichar_Symbols

## Analysis symbols
The morphological analyses of wordforms for the Choctaw
language are presented in this system in terms of the following symbols.
(It is highly suggested to follow existing standards when adding new tags).

The parts-of-speech are:

NOUNS
Cases:

Determiners

Possessive prefixes
VERBS
Not certain
Causative and Question suffixes

Verb person and tense markers

Verb Evidentials and IF markers

Causative

Possessive prefixes

Which possessive prefixes are taken?

Are possessive prefixes required?

For demonstratives

Case marking on participles

VERBS
Verb types

Agreement prefixes/suffixes on verbs

TODO sort these:

Punctuation

Actual multicharacters

archiphonemes

verb infix archiphonemes "grades"

LEXICON START

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-cho/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>

---
